North Carolina statutes. Chapter 22. Contracts Requiring Writing.
§ 22-1.
Contracts charging representative personally; promise to answer for debt of another.

No action shall be brought whereby to charge an executor, administrator or collector upon a special promise to answer damages out of his own estate or to charge any defendant upon a special promise to answer the debt, default or miscarriage of another person, unless the agreement upon which such action shall be brought, or some memorandum or note thereof, shall be in writing, and signed by the party charged therewith or some other person thereunto by him lawfully authorized.

History.

29 Charles II, c. 3, s. 4; 1826, c. 10; R.C., c. 50, s. 15; Code, s. 1552; Rev., s. 974; C.S., s. 987.

Cross References.

As to promise or acknowledgment of new or continuing contract from which statute of limitations may run, see

G.S. 1-26

.

As to waiver or renunciation of claim of right after breach, see

G.S. 25-1-107

.

As to statutes of frauds for personal property, see

G.S. 25-1-206

, 25-2-201, 25-2-209, 25-8-319.

As to letters of credit being in writing, see

G.S. 25-5-104

.

As to contracts for sale of investment securities, see G.S. 25-8-319.

As to formal requisites of personal property security agreements and financing statements, see

G.S. 25-9-203

,

G.S. 25-9-402

.

As to contracts to refrain from business in given territory, see

G.S. 75-4

.

Legal Periodicals.

For case law survey as to statute of frauds, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 907, 966 (1967).

For note discussing the application of the main purpose rule in the statute of frauds, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 117 (1975).

For article, “The Regulation of Contractual Change: A Guide to No Oral Modification Clauses for North Carolina Lawyers,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2239 (2003).

§ 22-2.
Contract for sale of land; leases.

All contracts to sell or convey any lands, tenements or hereditaments, or any interest in or concerning them, and all leases and contracts for leasing land for the purpose of digging for gold or other minerals, or for mining generally, of whatever duration; and all other leases and contracts for leasing lands exceeding in duration three years from the making thereof, shall be void unless said contract, or some memorandum or note thereof, be put in writing and signed by the party to be charged therewith, or by some other person by him thereto lawfully authorized.

History.

29 Charles II, c. 3, ss. 1, 2, 3; 1819, c. 1016, P.R; 1844, c. 44; R.C., c. 50, s. 11; 1868, c. 156, ss. 2, 33; Code, ss. 1554, 1743; Rev., s. 976; C.S., s. 988.

Cross References.

As to transfers of registered land, see

G.S. 43-38

.

As to conveyances, contracts to convey options and leases of land, see

G.S. 47-18

.

Legal Periodicals.

For discussion of effect of this section upon mortgage deeds absolute in form, see 26 N.C.L. Rev. 405 (1948).

For note on recovery of payments by vendee under contract void under statute of frauds, see 30 N.C.L. Rev. 292 (1952).

For note on rights of lessees under oral leases, see 31 N.C.L. Rev. 498 (1953).

For comment on parol boundary settlements, see 40 N.C.L. Rev. 304 (1962).

For note on recovery by third party beneficiary on quantum meruit, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 890 (1963).

For article on options to purchase real property in North Carolina, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 63 (1965).

For article concerning the quest for clear land titles in North Carolina, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 89 (1965).

For note on the sufficiency of a will as a memorandum for purposes of the statute of frauds, see 54 N.C.L. Rev. 976 (1976).

For article, “Future Advances and Title Insurance Coverage,” see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 329 (1979).

For comment on the seal in North Carolina and the need for reform, see 15 Wake Forest L. Rev. 251 (1979).

For survey of 1982 law on property, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1171 (1983).

For note on waiver of closing date in land sales contracts in North Carolina, in light of Fletcher v. Jones,

314 N.C. 389

, 333 S.E.2d 731 (1985), see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 546 (1986).

For article, “Private Land Use Controls: Enforcement Problems with Real Covenants and Equitable Servitudes in North Carolina,” see 22 Wake Forest L. Rev. 749 (1987).

For article, “The Regulation of Contractual Change: A Guide to No Oral Modification Clauses for North Carolina Lawyers,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2239 (2003).

For article, “Automatic Stays and Administrative Expenses: Rights and Remedies Available to Landlords and Tenants in Bankruptcy Proceedings,” see 31 Campbell L. Rev. 413 (2009).

As to recovery on quantum meruit for services rendered pursuant to oral contract to devise, see 26 N.C.L. Rev. 417.

§ 22-3.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1995, c. 379, s. 15.

§ 22-4.
Promise to revive debt of bankrupt.

No promise to pay a debt discharged by any decree of a court of competent jurisdiction, in any proceeding in bankruptcy, shall be received in evidence unless such promise is in writing and signed by the party to be charged therewith.

History.

1899, c. 57; Rev., s. 978; C.S., s. 990.

Legal Periodicals.

For possible construction of this section, see 13 N.C.L. Rev. 60 (1935).

§ 22-5.
Commercial loan commitments.

No commercial loan commitment by a bank, savings and loan association, or credit union for a loan in excess of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) shall be binding unless the commitment is in writing and signed by the party to be bound. As used in this section, the term “commercial loan commitment” means an offer, agreement, commitment, or contract to extend credit primarily for business or commercial purposes and does not include charge or credit card accounts, personal lines of credit, overdrafts, or any other consumer account. Offers, agreements, commitments, or contracts to extend credit primarily for aquaculture, agricultural, or farming purposes are specifically exempted from the provisions of this section.

History.

1989, c. 678.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Regulation of Contractual Change: A Guide to No Oral Modification Clauses for North Carolina Lawyers,” see 81 N.C.L. Rev. 2239 (2003).